Utah statutes.
53A-11-305.   Immunization by local health departments -- Fees.

(1)  If a student has not been immunized against a disease specified by the Department of Health, he may be immunized by the local health department upon the request of his parent or guardian, or upon the student's request if he is of legal age.  The local health department may charge a fee to cover the cost of administration of the vaccine.

(2)  The vaccine necessary for immunizations required under Sections 53A-11-301 and 53A-11-303 shall be furnished to local departments of health by the Department of Health.  The Department of Health may recover all or part of the cost of vaccines purchased with state funds by charging local health departments a fee for those vaccines. Local health departments may pass the cost of the vaccine on to the student, his parent or guardian, or other responsible party.  However, a child may not be refused immunizations by the local health department in his area of residence because of inability to pay.

(3)  The Department of Health shall establish the fee for administration of vaccines, as provided by Subsection (1), and shall establish fees for vaccines.



Amended by Chapter 202, 1988 General Session

